California statutes. Water Code
A regional wholesale water supplier shall reimburse the state for all costs incurred by the State Department of Public Health or the Seismic Safety Commission in carrying out the duties imposed by this division. The bay area wholesale customers shall reimburse the city for their share of those costs as provided in the master water sales contract. The wholesale customers of regional wholesale water suppliers other than the city are responsible for reimbursing the regional wholesale water supplier for their proportionate share of those costs,
 through the imposition of water charges.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 99, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2009.   Repealed as of January 1, 2036, pursuant to Section 73514.)
-------------------------------------------

73513.

Nothing in this division affects the rights and obligations of the city, the Modesto Irrigation District, or the Turlock Irrigation District, as between themselves, whether arising from statute or contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 841, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.   Repealed as of January 1, 2036, pursuant to Section 73514.)
-------------------------------------------

73513.5.

Nothing in this division changes the governance, control, or ownership of the bay area regional water system.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 841, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.   Repealed as of January 1, 2036, pursuant to Section 73514.)
-------------------------------------------

73514.

This division shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2036, and as of that date is repealed, unless a later enacted statute, that is enacted before January 1, 2036, deletes or extends that date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 203, Sec. 4.   (AB 2962)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2036, by its own provisions.   Note: Repeal affects Division 20.5, commencing with Section 73500.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 21. WATER CONSERVATION DISTRICTS [74000. - 76501.]



PART 1. INTRODUCTORY PROVISIONS [74000. - 74019.]



  CHAPTER 1. Short Title and General Provisions [74000. - 74001.]

74000.

This division shall be known and may be cited as the Water Conservation District Law of 1931.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

74001.

This division shall be liberally construed to carry out the purposes and intent hereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Definitions [74010. - 74019.]

74010.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the provisions of this chapter govern the construction of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

74011.

The definition of a word applies to any of its variants.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

74012.

“District” means a water conservation district formed pursuant to the Conservation Act of California (Chapter 332, Statutes of 1919), the Water Conservation Act of 1929 (Chapter 166, Statutes of 1929), the Water Conservation Act of 1931 (Chapter 1020, Statutes of 1931), or this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

74013.

“Board” means the board of directors of a district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

74014.

“Principal county” means the county in which the lands within a district or a proposed district, or the greater portion thereof, are situated, and is the county in which the petition for the formation of a district is filed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

74015.

“Affected county” means any county in which the land of a district is situated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

74016.

“Board of supervisors” means the board of supervisors of the principal county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

74017.

“President” means the president of the board of directors of a district and “secretary” means the secretary of the board of directors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

74018.

“Treasurer” means the treasurer of the principal county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

74019.

“General district election” means the election held on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in November of each odd-numbered year, after the organization of the district, at which directors for the district shall be elected to fill the offices of the directors whose terms of office shall then expire, in accordance with the provisions of this division and the Uniform District Election Law. The election shall be called and conducted and the results canvassed, returned, and declared pursuant to the provisions of the Uniform District Election Law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 2. FORMATION [74030. - 74136.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [74030. - 74033.]

74030.

A district may be organized and established by the board of supervisors of any county in this state, as expressly provided in this part, when the conditions stated in this part are found to exist, and may exercise the powers expressly granted in this division, or necessarily implied.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

74031.

A district may be organized upon petition by the qualified electors in an area comprising the whole or a part or parts of one or more watersheds of any stream or streams of water or unnavigable river or rivers, or territory adjacent to such watershed or watersheds, or deriving such area’s water supply, in whole or in part, from such stream or streams, or river or rivers, or the subterranean supply of waters therefrom, for the conservation of the waters of such stream or streams or unnavigable river or rivers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

74032.

A district may be entirely within unincorporated territory or partly within unincorporated and partly within incorporated territory, and may be within one or more counties.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

74033.

The territory to be included within a district need not be contiguous.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Formation Petition [74050. - 74056.]

74050.

A petition for the formation of a district, signed by at least 20 percent or 500 of the qualified electors within the proposed district, shall be presented to the board of supervisors of the principal county. The petition shall be presented at a regular meeting of the board of supervisors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

74051.

Any elector residing within the proposed district, whose name appears on the register of voters of the last general election, or on the register of voters at any time within 30 days preceding the presentation of a petition for the formation of a district, shall be deemed to be a qualified elector of the proposed district eligible to sign the petition.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

74052.

The petition shall set forth and particularly describe the proposed boundaries of the district, shall pray that the district be organized under the provisions of this division, and shall propose a name by which the district shall be known. The petition shall also request the board of supervisors, upon its definition and establishment of the proposed boundaries of the district, to divide the district into either three, five, or seven divisions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

74053.

The petition shall be published once a week for at least three weeks before the presentation to the board of supervisors in some newspaper printed and published in the principal county, together with a notice stating the date of the meeting of the board at which the petition will be presented.

If any portion of the proposed district lies within another county, or counties, the petition and notice shall be likewise published in a newspaper printed and published in each of such counties.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

74054.

The petition may consist of any number of separate instruments, and, when contained upon more than one instrument, one copy only of the petition need be published, but the names of all the petitioners shall be published the same as if appended to the original petition.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

74055.

All copies of the petition filed prior to the hearing of the petition shall be considered by the board of supervisors the same as though filed with the petition first placed on file.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

74056.

The petition may include a statement that all bonds of the district and all bonds of any improvement district created therein shall be payable from assessments to be levied upon all real property in the proposed district or in the improvement district created therein. If such a statement is included in the petition, the notice of hearing of the petition and the notice of election for the formation of the district shall so state, and, if the district is formed, all bonds thereafter issued by the district and all bonds of any improvement district organized therein shall be payable from assessments levied upon all real property in district or improvement district, as the case may be, and such real property shall be liable to be taxed for the payment of principal and interest of such bonded indebtedness until the bonds are fully paid. Any such assessment shall be levied in the manner provided in this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Hearing [74070. - 74076.]

74070.

When a formation petition is presented, the board of supervisors shall hear it, and may adjourn the hearing from time to time. If any hearing or continued hearing is continued to a time more than 60 days from the date of the order making the continuance, a notice of the continued hearing shall be published in some newspaper or newspapers printed and published in each of the counties in which any portion of the proposed district lies once a week for at least two weeks immediately prior to the time appointed for the continued hearing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

74071.

On the final hearing the board of supervisors shall make such changes in the proposed boundaries as may be deemed advisable, and shall define and establish such boundaries. The board of supervisors shall not modify such boundaries so as to exclude from the proposed district any territory which would be benefited by the formation of the district; nor shall any land be included within the proposed district which will not, in the judgment of the board, be benefited by the formation of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

74072.

Any person whose lands would be benefited by the district may, upon his application and in the discretion of the board of supervisors, have such lands included within the proposed district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

74073.

Upon the hearing of the formation petition the board of supervisors shall determine whether or not the petition complies with the requirements of this division, and for that purpose shall hear all competent and relevant testimony offered in support thereof or in opposition thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

74074.

No defect in the contents of the formation petition, or in the title to or form of the notice, or signature, shall vitiate any proceedings thereon; provided, such petition or petitions have a sufficient number of qualified signatures attached thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

74075.

The determination of the board of supervisors shall be entered upon the minutes of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

74076.

If the board of supervisors finds that protest has been made prior to its final determination for formation of the district, by the owners of land, or by the owners of real property in the event of the applicability of the provisions of Section 74056, within the proposed district the assessed value of which, as shown by the last equalized assessment roll, constitutes more than one-half of the total assessed value of the land or real property, as the case may be, within the proposed district, the proceeding shall terminate. The board of supervisors shall order the proceeding terminated when such protests are received.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Formation Election [74090. - 74106.]

74090.

When the boundaries of the proposed district are defined and established by the board of supervisors, it shall make an order dividing the district into three, five, or seven divisions, as requested in the formation petition. Such divisions shall be as nearly equal in area as practicable and shall be numbered consecutively.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

74091.

One director, who shall be an elector of the division, shall be elected from each division by vote of the electors of the division in which such director resides. In order to qualify to be elected a director, a person shall be a qualified elector of the district and shall be a resident of the county, or of one of the counties, in which the district is situated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

74092.

When the order dividing the proposed district into divisions has been made, the board of supervisors shall call an election within the proposed district to determine whether the district shall be formed and also to elect the first board of directors if the district is formed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

74093.

The formation election shall be held on the next established election date not less than 74 days after the date of filing the formation petition.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1146.)
-------------------------------------------

74094.

The board of supervisors shall divide the district, and the divisions thereof, into convenient precincts and fix a polling place in each precinct. There shall be at least one precinct in each division of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

74095.

The board of supervisors shall appoint an inspector, a judge, and two clerks for each of the precincts established to conduct the election. The inspector, judge, and clerks of election in each precinct shall constitute the board of election for such precinct.

If the board of election, or any member thereof, fails to appear at the opening of the polls on the morning of the election, the electors of the precinct present at that hour may appoint a board or supply the place of an absent member thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

74096.

The inspector shall be chairman of the election board, and may appoint judges and clerks, if, during the progress of the election, any judge or clerk cease to act. The chairman or any member of the board of election may administer and certify oaths required to be administered during the progress of the election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

74097.

The formation election shall be called by publication of notice thereof in a daily or weekly paper in each of the counties in which the district is situated, if there is one, at least once a week for three weeks previous to the election, and by posting notice thereof in three public places.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

74098.

The notice of the formation election shall designate a name for the proposed district and describe the boundaries thereof. The notice shall also designate the respective election precincts and the polling place in each, the election officers, the time of the election, and the hours during which the polls will be kept open; provided, that the polls shall be opened not later than 8 o'clock a.m. and kept open until 7 o'clock p.m.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

74099.

The board of supervisors shall require the clerk of the board to provide and furnish ballots for the formation election. No particular form of ballot shall be required. To the right of or below the question on the ballot, the words “Yes” and “No” shall be printed on separate lines, with voting targets. The ballot shall also contain the names of candidates for the position of director of the district who shall have been endorsed by petitions to the board of supervisors in the manner prescribed in Section 74100.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 303, Sec. 64.   (AB 1512)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

74100.

A nominating petition for a director in any division shall be signed by 10 or more electors entitled to vote in such division and shall be filed with the board of supervisors calling the formation election within 15 days from the first publication of the notice calling the election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

74101.

The ballots shall contain instructions that the voters shall completely select the voting target next to the words that indicate the voter’s choice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 303, Sec. 65.   (AB 1512)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

74102.

The ballots shall contain as many blank spaces for the names of directors as there are directors to be elected, and the writing of the name of any qualified person in any of the spaces shall be deemed to be a vote for such person.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

74103.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the formation election shall be conducted in accordance with the general election laws of this state so far as applicable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

74104.

The election officers shall publicly count the votes immediately after the close of the formation election, and shall make a report of the result of the election to the board of supervisors within five days subsequent to the holding thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

74105.

The board of supervisors shall, on the first Monday succeeding the formation election, if then in session, or at its next meeting, general or special, proceed to canvass the votes cast at the election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

74106.

Where a vote to form a district is lost, no petition for the formation of a district comprising any portion of the same territory shall be presented or considered for a period of 12 months thereafter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Establishment of District [74120. - 74122.]

74120.

If a majority of all the votes cast at the formation election are “Water conservation district—Yes,” the board of supervisors shall by an order entered in its minutes declare the territory duly formed as a water conservation district, under the designated name, and shall declare the persons receiving, respectively, the highest number of votes for director to be duly elected to such offices.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

74121.

The board of supervisors shall immediately cause a copy of the order declaring the district formed, duly certified by the clerk of the board, to be filed for record in the office of the county recorder of any county in which any portion of the lands embraced in the district is situated, and shall also immediately forward a copy thereof to the clerk of the board of supervisors of each of such counties. From and after such filing, the formation of the district is complete.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

74122.

The clerk of the board of supervisors shall immediately file with the Secretary of State a certificate listing:

(a) The name of the district.

(b) The date of formation.

(c) The county or counties in which the district is located, and a description of the boundaries of the district, or reference to a map showing such boundaries, which map shall be attached to the certificate, or reference to the county recorder’s office where a description of such boundaries has been recorded.

If the order declaring the district formed contains all of the information required to be in the certificate, the clerk of the board may file a copy of the order in lieu of the certificate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Contest of Election [74130. - 74136.]

74130.

The formation election may be contested by any person holding property within the proposed district liable to be assessed for the raising of funds to carry out the purposes of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

74131.

The directors elected at the formation election shall be made parties defendant in the election contest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

74132.

The election contest shall be brought in the superior court of the principal county. If more than one contest is pending, they shall be consolidated and tried together.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

74133.

The court shall immediately try the election contest, and determine, upon the hearing, whether the election was fairly conducted and in substantial compliance with the requirements of this division. The court shall enter its judgment accordingly.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

74134.

The election contest shall be brought within 20 days after the canvass of the votes and declaration of the result by the board of supervisors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

74135.

Either party to the record may appeal to the Supreme Court of this state within 30 days from entry of judgment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

74136.

The appeal shall be heard and determined by the Supreme Court within 60 days from the time of filing the notice of appeal.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 3. INTERNAL ORGANIZATION [74200. - 74253.]



  CHAPTER 1. Directors [74200. - 74209.]

74200.

The board of directors shall consist of three, five, or seven members, depending on the number of divisions in the district. Each director shall be an elector of the division for which he is elected, a qualified elector of the district, and a resident of the county, or of one of the counties, in which the district is situated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

74200.5.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this part, the local agency formation commission, in approving either a consolidation of districts or the reorganization of two or more districts into a single water conservation district may, pursuant to subdivisions (k) and (n) of Section 56886 of the Government Code, increase the number of directors to serve on the board of directors of the consolidated or reorganized district to 7, 9, or 11, who shall be members of the board of directors of the districts to be consolidated or reorganized as of the effective date of the consolidation or reorganization.

(b) Unless the local agency formation commission provides for an
 alternative schedule for reducing the size of the board of directors of the consolidated or reorganized district, upon the expiration of the terms of the members of the board of directors of the consolidated or reorganized district whose terms first expire following the effective date of the consolidation or reorganization, the total number of members on the board of directors shall be reduced until the number equals 5, 7, or 9, as may be determined by the local agency formation commission in approving the consolidation or reorganization.

(c) In addition to the powers granted under Section 1780 of the Government Code, in the event of a vacancy on the board of directors of the consolidated or reorganized district at which time the total number of directors is greater than five, the board of directors may, by majority vote of the remaining members of the board, choose not
 to fill the vacancy. In that event, the total membership of the board of directors shall be reduced by one board member. Upon making the determination not to fill a vacancy, the board of directors shall notify the board of supervisors of its decision.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 514, Sec. 1.   (AB 1172)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

74201.

The directors elected at the formation election shall immediately enter upon their duties as such upon qualifying in the manner provided in this chapter. Such directors shall hold office respectively until their successors are elected and qualified.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

74202.

The directors of any district who are elected shall hold office pursuant to Section 10505 of the Elections Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 923, Sec. 267.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

74203.

Each director elected subsequent to the formation election shall hold office for a term of four years and until his successor is elected and qualified.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

74204.

Vacancies occurring in the board, by reason of death, resignation, or otherwise, shall be filled pursuant to Section 1780 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1059.)
-------------------------------------------

74205.

Upon his election or appointment, each person who shall be elected or appointed to the office of director shall qualify as such by taking and subscribing to an official oath and executing and filing a bond as provided in Section 74206.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

74206.

Each director shall execute an official bond in the sum of one thousand dollars ($1,000). The director shall file that official bond, together with his or her official oath, with the secretary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 167, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

74207.

All official bonds shall be in the form prescribed by law for the official bonds of county officers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

74208.

Each director shall receive compensation in an amount not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100) per day for each day’s attendance at meetings of the board or for each day’s service rendered as a director by request of the board, not exceeding a total of six days in any calendar month, together with any expenses incurred in the performance of his or her duties required or authorized by the board. For purposes of this section, the determination of whether a director’s activities on any specific day are compensable shall be made pursuant to Article 2.3 (commencing with Section 53232) of Chapter 2 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code. Reimbursement for these expenses is subject to Sections 53232.2 and 53232.3 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 700, Sec. 40.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

74209.

(a) A district with a board consisting of seven directors may reduce the number of directors to five pursuant to this section. A reduction in the number of directors shall not be made within 180 days preceding the election of a director.

(b) In order to reduce the number of directors pursuant to this section, the board shall adopt, by a recorded vote of two-thirds of the total membership of the board, a resolution proposing to reduce the number of directors from seven to five. The resolution shall contain a map and description of the boundaries for the five divisions proposed to be established.

(c) The secretary of the district shall set a date for a public hearing on the proposal to reduce the number
 of directors, which shall be not less than 30 days and not more than 60 days after the date on which the board adopted the resolution described in subdivision (b). The secretary shall give notice of the hearing, which shall include a description of the proposal and shall contain a map and general description of the proposed boundaries of the five divisions. The secretary shall give notice of the hearing by publishing a notice pursuant to Section 6063 of the Government Code in at least one newspaper of general circulation within the jurisdiction of the district at least 10 days before the hearing. In addition, the secretary shall mail the notice to a person who has filed a written request for notice with the secretary at least 10 days before the hearing.

(d) At the hearing, the board shall receive and consider any written or oral comments regarding the proposed reduction in the number of directors. After receiving and considering those comments,
 the board, by a recorded vote of two-thirds of the total membership of the board, shall do either of the following:

(1) Disapprove the proposal.

(2) Adopt a resolution that orders the reduction in the number of members of the board.

(e) The adoption of a resolution that orders a reduction in the number of members of the board pursuant to this section is a legislative act that is subject to referendum pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 9340) of Chapter 4 of Division 9 of the Elections Code.

(f) A reduction in the number of directors and a change in division boundaries pursuant to this section shall not affect the term of office of any director. A director of a division for which boundaries have been changed shall continue to be the director
 of the division bearing the number of his or her division until the office becomes vacant by means of term expiration or otherwise, whether or not the director is a resident within the boundaries of the division as changed. The successor to the office of a director of a division for which boundaries have been changed shall be a resident and voter of that division.

(g) This section does not apply to districts within the County of Ventura, which are subject to the provisions of Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 74450) of Part 4.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 162, Sec. 186.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. The Board [74220. - 74229.]

74220.

On the first Tuesday next following the formation election, as to the first board, and at the first meeting of the board following the time of taking office of the directors elected in each subsequent general district election, but in no event later than the last day of December, the directors shall meet and organize as a board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 167, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

74221.

The board shall manage and conduct the business and affairs of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

74222.

The office of the board may be established by it at some proper and convenient place within or near the district, but after the office is once established, it shall not be changed without giving notice thereof by posting in three public places in the district and by publishing a similar notice at least once a week for 30 days in some newspaper of general circulation published in the principal county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

74223.

The board shall hold regular meetings in its office on the first Tuesday in March, June, September, and December, and such special meetings as may be required for the proper transaction of business. Upon a finding by the board for good cause, the board may, by resolution, increase the frequency and number of regular meetings.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 183, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

74224.

Notwithstanding Section 74223, the board may, by resolution, change the day and location for holding regular meetings. Notice of any change shall be published once a week for at least two consecutive weeks before the date for a regular meeting in a newspaper of general circulation circulated in the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 566, Sec. 4.   Effective September 29, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

74225.

Special meetings may be ordered by the president or by a majority of the members of the board, specifying in writing the business to be transacted. The order calling for a special meeting shall be entered in the minutes of the board. Three days’ notice shall be given by the secretary to any member not joining in the order, by mailing the notice to him at his last address. Only the business specified in the order shall be transacted at the special meeting.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

74226.

All meetings of the board shall be open to the public.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

74227.

A majority of the members of the board shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

74228.

A minute of all proceedings of the board shall be kept by the secretary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 371.)
-------------------------------------------

74228.5.

A district may destroy a record pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 60200) of Division 1 of Title 6 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 158, Sec. 44.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

74229.

The board shall, annually, make and render a verified statement of the financial condition of the district, showing particularly the receipts and disbursements of the last preceding year, together with the source of such receipts and purpose of such disbursements. This statement shall be placed on file in the office of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 371.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Officers [74250. - 74253.]

74250.

At each of its organization meetings the board shall elect a president from their number, and shall appoint a secretary, who shall each hold office at the pleasure of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

74251.

The secretary need not be one of the directors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

74252.

The salary of the secretary and the amount of the bond to be given for the faithful performance of his duties shall be fixed by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

74253.

The bond of the secretary shall be recorded in the office of the recorder of the principal county and then filed with the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 4. ELECTIONS [74430. - 74470.]



  CHAPTER 3. Relocation of Division Boundaries [74430. - 74435.]

74430.

The board of directors shall, by resolution, adjust the boundaries of any divisions pursuant to Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 22000) of Division 21 of the Elections Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 435, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

74431.

Before any change of the boundaries of the divisions is made pursuant to Section 74430, the board shall give notice of its intention to do so. Such notice shall specify, in a general way, the changes which the board proposes to make and a time and place for a hearing at which any owner of land in the district may appear before the board and object to the making of the proposed change or changes or petition that a change be made otherwise than as proposed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

74432.

The notice of intention to change the boundaries of the divisions shall be published at least once a week for two weeks before the time appointed for the hearing in some newspaper or newspapers published in each of the counties in which any part of the district is situated.

At the time and place appointed for the hearing, or at the time and place to which the hearing may be adjourned, the board shall hear all the objections and petitions which are presented to the board, and, thereupon, the board may make such change or changes in the boundaries of the divisions as it determines to be for the best interests of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

74433.

If land is excluded from a district pursuant to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 75750) of Part 10 of this division, the board not less than 30 days before any election in the district, may reestablish the boundaries of the divisions and election precincts within the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

74434.

If land is included within a district pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 75850) of Part 10 of this division, the board shall, not less than 30 days before any election in the district, reestablish the boundaries of the divisions and election precincts within the district so as to include such lands therein and so as to make such divisions as nearly equal in area as may be practicable. In case of the inclusion of any land less than 30 days before an election within the district, the inhabitants of the land so included shall not be entitled to vote at such election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

74435.
